Utah statutes.
10-3b-204.   Presenting council action to mayor -- Veto -- Reconsideration -- When ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation takes effect.

(1)  The council in each municipality operating under a council-mayor form of municipal government shall present to the mayor each ordinance, tax levy, and appropriation passed by the council.

(2) (a)  The mayor in a municipality operating under a council-mayor form of municipal government may veto an ordinance or tax levy or all or any part of an appropriation passed by the council.

(b)  If a mayor vetoes an ordinance or tax levy or all or any part of an appropriation, the mayor shall return the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation to the council within 15 days after the council presents the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation to the mayor, with a statement explaining the mayor's objections.

(3)  At its next meeting following a mayor's veto under Subsection (2), the council shall reconsider the vetoed ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation.

(4)  An ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation passed by the council takes effect upon recording as provided in Chapter 3, Part 7, Municipal Ordinances, Resolutions, and Procedure, if:

(a)  the mayor signs the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation;

(b)  the mayor fails to sign the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation within 15 days after the council presents the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation to the mayor; or

(c)  following a veto, the council reconsiders the ordinance, tax levy, or appropriation and passes it by a vote of at least two-thirds of all council members.

